Hawaii, session 2025, HB1095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 356D-6.7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§356D-6.7[]]  Closed to the public.  (a) Any area within a housing project or on a parcel owned by the authority that is not a public street, road, highway, sidewalk, or county or state bus stop, shall be closed to the public where signs are displayed that read:  "Closed to the Public  No Trespassing", or a substantially similar message; provided that the signs: (1)  Contain letters no less than two inches in height; and (2)  Are placed at reasonable intervals no less than three signs to a mile along the boundary line of the areas that are closed to the public and at all entrances to the property, in a manner and position to be clearly noticeable from outside the boundary line. (b)  Any authority office or facility shall be closed to the public during non-business hours where signs are displayed that read:  "Closed to the Public  No Trespassing", or a substantially similar message, and include hours of operation. [(b)] (c)  For the purposes of this section: "Housing project" means a public housing project, elder or elderly housing, as defined in section 356D-1, or state low-income housing project, as defined in section 356D-51." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST